Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Dam Safety Act.

§ 10.1-604.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Alteration”
means changes to an impounding structure that could alter or affect its structural integrity. Alterations include, but are not limited to, changing the height or otherwise enlarging the dam, increasing normal pool or principal spillway elevation or physical dimensions, changing the elevation or physical dimensions of the emergency spillway, conducting necessary repairs or structural maintenance, or removing the impounding structure.

“Board”
means the Soil and Water Conservation Board.

“Construction”
means the construction of a new impounding structure.

“Dam break inundation zone”
means the area downstream of a dam that would be inundated or otherwise directly affected by the failure of a dam.

“Height”
means the structural height of a dam which is defined as the vertical distance from the natural bed of the stream or watercourse measured at the downstream toe of the dam to the top of the dam.

“Impounding structure”
means a man-made structure, whether a dam across a watercourse or other structure outside a watercourse, used or to be used to retain or store waters or other materials. The term includes: (i) all dams that are twenty-five feet or greater in height and that create an impoundment capacity of fifteen acre-feet or greater, and (ii) all dams that are six feet or greater in height and that create an impoundment capacity of fifty acre-feet or greater. The term “impounding structure” shall not include: (a) dams licensed by the State Corporation Commission that are subject to a safety inspection program; (b) dams owned or licensed by the United States government; (c) dams operated primarily for agricultural purposes which are less than twenty-five feet in height or which create a maximum impoundment capacity smaller than 100 acre-feet; (d) water or silt retaining dams approved pursuant to §

45.2-618

or

45.2-1301

; or (e) obstructions in a canal used to raise or lower water.

“Owner”
means the owner of the land on which a dam is situated, the holder of an easement permitting the construction of a dam and any person or entity agreeing to maintain a dam.

“Watercourse”
means a natural channel having a well-defined bed and banks and in which water normally flows.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.1; 1986, c. 9; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 92; 2006, c. 30.

Cross references.

As to impoundment of diffused surface waters, see § 62.1-105.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 475 and 489, cl. 1, effective April 1, 2014, provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Conservation and Recreation, on behalf of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, shall utilize a storm-based approach in order to derive the Probable Maximum Precipitation (PMP) for locations within or affecting the Commonwealth. The PMP revisions shall be based on accepted storm evaluation techniques and take into account such factors as basin characteristics that affect the occurrence and location of storms and precipitation, regional and basin terrain influences, available atmospheric moisture, and seasonality of storm types. The results shall be considered by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in its decision to authorize the use of the updated PMP values in Probable Maximum Flood calculations, thus replacing the current PMP values. Such PMP revisions shall be adopted by the Board if it finds that the analysis is valid and reliable and will result in cost savings to owners for impounding structure spillway construction or rehabilitation efforts.

“§ 2. The development of the methodology shall be completed by December 1, 2015.

“§ 3. Owners of impounding structures with spillway design inadequacies who maintain coverage under a Conditional Operation and Maintenance Certificate in accordance with the Board’s Impounding Structure Regulations (4VAC50-20) shall not be required to rehabilitate the spillway of their impounding structure until the analysis required under § 1 has been completed and reviewed by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board. Such owners shall remain subject to all other requirements of the Dam Safety Act (§

10.1-604

et seq.) and regulations.”

Effective October 1, 2021,
“§

45.2-618

or

45.2-1301

” was substituted for “§ 45.1-222 or § 45.1-225.1”
to conform to Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 92, effective July 1, 2002, in the paragraph defining “Impounding structure,” inserted the present second sentence, and in the present third sentence, substituted the designations (a) through (e) for former designations (i) through (v), and deleted “(vi) nonagricultural dams which are less than twenty-five feet in height or which create a maximum impoundment smaller than 50 acre-feet; or (vii) dams not more than six feet in height regardless of storage capacity or with a storage capacity of not more than 15 acre-feet regardless of height” at the end thereof.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 30 added the paragraphs defining “Alteration,” “Construction,” and “Dam break inundation zone”; and in the definition for “Impounding structure,” substituted “man-made structure” for “man-made device” in the first sentence and deleted “constructed maintained or” following “(c) dams.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-121. Affidavit for Dam Inspection Warrant; No. 9-122. Dam Inspection Warrant; No. 16-573. Agreement for Right to Inundate.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Mills and Milldams, § 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Impounding structure.” —

Irrigation is not a necessary element for a farm pond to qualify for the agricultural exemption, provided the impounded waters are utilized in a manner found to be required for agricultural production. The determination of whether the agricultural exemption applies to any particular structure is primarily a factual question reserved to the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation on a case-by-case basis. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas C. Wright, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 12-074, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/13).

Agricultural exemption. —

Absent a specific definition in the Dam Safety Act, it is appropriate to look to the definition of the term “forester” provided in the statutes governing the Department of Forestry as an interpretative guide, and that a forester differs from an orchardist in that an orchardist harvests fruit, nuts or sap from trees, while a forester is concerned with the timber itself. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas C. Wright, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 12-074, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/13).

§ 10.1-604.1.
Determination of hazard potential classification.

The hazard potential classification for an impounding structure shall be determined by one of the following procedures:

The owner of an impounding structure that does not currently hold a regular or conditional certificate from the Board, or the owner of an impounding structure that is already under certificate but the owner believes that a condition has changed downstream of the impounding structure that may reduce its hazard potential classification, may request that the Department conduct a simplified dam break inundation zone analysis to determine whether the impounding structure has a low hazard potential classification. The owner shall pay 50 percent of the cost of the analysis. If the Department finds that the impounding structure has a low hazard potential classification, the owner shall be eligible for general permit coverage in accordance with §

10.1-605.3

. If the Department finds that the impounding structure appears to be a high or significant hazard potential structure, the owner’s engineer shall provide further analysis in accordance with §

10.1-606.2

and the criteria set out in the Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20). The owner may be eligible for grant assistance in accordance with §

10.1-603.19

.

The owner may propose a hazard potential classification that shall be subject to approval by the Board. To support the proposed hazard classification, an analysis shall be conducted by the owner’s engineer and shall comply with the criteria set out in the Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20). If the engineer finds that the impounding structure has a low hazard potential classification, the owner shall be eligible for general permit coverage in accordance with §

10.1-605.3

.An impounding structure’s hazard potential classification’s determination shall include an analysis of those hazards created by flood and nonflood dam failures. In conducting the hazard potential classification, the Department or the owner’s engineer may utilize an incremental damage analysis. When considering the failure of the impounding structure under a flood condition, such engineers shall only consider those hazards that exceed those created by the flood event.

Any owner aggrieved by a decision of the Department regarding his impounding structure shall have the right to judicial review of the final decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

The Board may adopt regulations in accordance with §

10.1-605

to establish a simplified methodology for dam break inundation zone analysis.

History.

2011, c. 637.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-605.
Promulgation of regulations by the Board; guidance document.

The Board shall adopt regulations to ensure that impounding structures in the Commonwealth are properly and safely constructed, maintained and operated. Dam safety regulations promulgated by the State Water Control Board shall remain in full force until amended in accordance with applicable procedures.

The Board’s Impounding Structure Regulations shall not require any impounding structure in existence or under a construction permit prior to July 1, 2010, that is currently classified as high hazard, or is subsequently found to be high hazard through reclassification, to upgrade its spillway to pass a rainfall event greater than the maximum recorded within the Commonwealth, which shall be deemed to be 90 percent of the probable maximum precipitation.

Such an impounding structure shall be determined to be in compliance with the spillway requirements of the regulations provided that (i) the impounding structure will pass two-thirds of the reduced probable maximum precipitation requirement described in this subsection and (ii) the dam owner certifies annually and by January 15 that such impounding structure meets each of the following conditions:

The owner has a current emergency action plan that is approved by the Board and that is developed and updated in accordance with the regulations;

The owner has exercised the emergency action plan in accordance with the regulations and conducts a table-top exercise at least once every two years;

The Department has verification that both the local organization for emergency management and the Virginia Department of Emergency Management have on file current emergency action plans and updates for the impounding structure;

That conditions at the impounding structure are monitored on a daily basis and as dictated by the emergency action plan;

The impounding structure is inspected at least annually by a professional engineer and all observed deficiencies are addressed within 120 days of such inspection;

The owner has a dam break inundation zone map developed in accordance with the regulations that is acceptable to the Department;

The owner is insured in an amount that will substantially cover the costs of downstream property losses to others that may result from a dam failure; and

The owner shall post the dam’s emergency action plan on his website, or upon the request of the owner, the Department or another state agency responsible for providing emergency management services to citizens agrees to post the plan on its website. If the Department or another state agency agrees to post the plan on its website, the owner shall provide the plan in a format suitable for posting.

The Board’s regulations shall establish an incremental damage analysis procedure that permits the spillway design flood requirement for an impounding structure to be reduced to the level at which dam failure shall not significantly increase downstream hazard to life or property, provided that the spillway design flood requirement shall not be reduced to below the 100-year flood event for high or significant hazard impounding structures, or to below the 50-year flood event for low hazard potential impounding structures.

The Board shall consider the impact of limited-use or private roadways with low traffic volume and low public safety risk that are downstream from or across an impounding structure in the determination of the hazard potential classification of an impounding structure.

2.

A dam owner who meets the conditions of subdivisions 1 a through 1 h, but has not provided record drawings to the Department for his impounding structure, shall submit a complete record report developed in accordance with the construction permit requirements of the Impounding Structure Regulations, excluding the required submittal of the record drawings.

3.

A dam owner who fails to submit certifications required by subdivisions 1 a through 1 h in a timely fashion shall not enjoy the presumption that such impounding structure is deemed to be in compliance with the spillway requirements of the Board’s Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20).

4.

Any dam owner who has submitted the certifications required by subdivisions 1 a through 1 h shall make (i) such certifications, (ii) the emergency action plan required by subdivision 1 a, and (iii) the certificate of insurance required by subdivision 1 g available, upon request and within five business days, to any person. A dam owner may comply with the requirements of this subdivision by providing the same information on a website and directing the requestor to such website. A dam owner who fails to comply with this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty pursuant to §

10.1-613.2

.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.2; 1986, c. 9; 1988, c. 891; 2010, cc. 249, 270; 2011, c. 323.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 249, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board may amend its Impounding Structure Regulations to conform with the provisions of this act through a regulatory process that is exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 249, effective April 8, 2010, added subsection B and inserted the subsection A designation.

The 2010 amendment by c. 270 added the subsection A designator, substituted “adopt” for “promulgate” in subsection A, and added subsections B and C, which were redesignated as subsections C and D at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 323 in subsection B, redesignated former subdivisions B 1 to 8 as paragraphs B 1 a to h, inserted present subdivision designations, inserted “and by January 15” in clause B 1 (ii), added B 3 and B 4, and made related changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Impounding structure.” —

Irrigation is not a necessary element for a farm pond to qualify for the agricultural exemption, provided the impounded waters are utilized in a manner found to be required for agricultural production. The determination of whether the agricultural exemption applies to any particular structure is primarily a factual question reserved to the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation on a case-by-case basis. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas C. Wright, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 12-074, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/13).

§ 10.1-605.1.
Delegation of powers and duties.

The Board may delegate to the Director or his designee any of the powers and duties vested in the Board by this article, except the adoption and promulgation of regulations. Delegation shall not remove from the Board authority to enforce the provisions of this article. At each meeting of the Board, the Director shall identify those impounding structures that are currently classified as high hazard and determined noncompliant with the spillway requirements of the Board’s Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20) or with statutory presumption provided by subsection B of §

10.1-605

.

History.

2006, c. 30; 2011, c. 323.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 323 deleted “or the issuance of certificates” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 10.1-605.2.
Certain regulations affecting impounding structures.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board shall, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.), adopt regulations that consider the impact of downstream limited-use or private roadways with low traffic volume and low public safety risk on the determination of the hazard potential classification of an impounding structure under the Dam Safety Act (§

10.1-604

et seq.).

History.

2010, c. 41.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 2010 act having assigned no number.

§ 10.1-605.3.
General permit for certain impounding structures.

The Board shall develop a general permit for the regulation of low hazard potential impounding structures in accordance with §

10.1-605

.

The regulations shall include the following:

A registration statement requiring:

The name and address of the owner;

The location of the impounding structure;

The height of the impounding structure;

The volume of water impounded; and

A certification from the owner that the impounding structure (i) is classified as low hazard pursuant to a determination by the Department or the owner’s professional engineer in accordance with §

10.1-604.1

; (ii) is, to the best of his knowledge, properly and safely constructed and currently has no observable deficiencies; and (iii) shall be maintained and operated in accordance with the provisions of the general permit.

The owner shall notify the Department immediately of any change in circumstances that would cause the impounding structure to no longer qualify for coverage under the general permit. In the event of a failure or an imminent failure at the impounding structure, the owner shall immediately notify the local emergency services coordinator, the Department of Emergency Management, and the Department. The Department shall take actions in accordance with §

10.1-608

or

10.1-609

, depending on the degree of hazard and the imminence of failure caused by the unsafe condition.

Failure to comply with the provisions of the general permit may result in penalties assessed in accordance with §§

10.1-613.1

and

10.1-613.2

.

In order to qualify for the provisions of §

10.1-606.3

, a dam owner eligible for a general permit shall file a dam break inundation map with the Department and with the offices with plat and plan approval authority or zoning responsibilities as designated by the locality for each locality in which the dam break inundation zone resides in accordance with §

10.1-606.2

.

If the failure of a low hazard potential impounding structure is not expected to cause loss of human life or economic damage to any property except property owned by the owner, the owner may follow the special criteria established for certain low hazard impounding structures in the Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20) in lieu of coverage under the general permit.

2.

A spillway design flood requirement of the 100-year flood. When appropriate, the spillway design flood requirement may be reduced to the 50-year flood in accordance with an incremental damage analysis.

3.

A simplified emergency preparedness plan that provides:

a.

Name and location information for the impounding structure;

b.

Name of owner and operator and associated contact information;

c.

Contact information for relevant emergency responders;

d.

Procedures for notifying downstream property owners or occupants; and

e.

Identification of any downstream roadways that would be impacted by a failure.

4.

An annual inspection of the impounding structure by the owner. No inspection of the impounding structure by a licensed professional engineer shall be required if the owner certifies at the time of general permit coverage renewal that conditions at the impounding structure and downstream are unchanged.

5.

Procedures for seeking and issuing coverage under the general permit.

6.

A six-year term of coverage under the general permit after which time the owner shall reapply for coverage by filing a new registration statement. The Board may, by regulation, establish a fee for the processing of registration statements.

History.

2011, c. 637.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-606.
Local advisory committee.

When requested by the governing body of any affected county or city, the Board shall provide for the creation of a local advisory committee to advise the Board on impoundments within that locality. The advisory committee shall include, but not be limited to, representation of the owner and each affected county or city. Prior to the issuance of any permits under this article, the Board shall advise any existing local advisory committee of any affected jurisdiction for which a permit is being sought, and request comments from the committee on the permit application. No permit shall be issued until at least sixty days after such a local advisory committee has been so advised.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.3; 1984, c. 240; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-606.1.
Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to mapping of dam break inundation zones, see §

10.1-606.2

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-606.1

authorized localities to map dam break inundation zones and was derived from 2005, c. 80; 2006, cc. 30, 648, 765.

§ 10.1-606.2.
Mapping of dam break inundation zones.

An owner of an impounding structure shall prepare a map of the dam break inundation zone for the impounding structure in accordance with criteria set out in the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20). Existing maps prepared by the locality in accordance with these regulations may be used for this purpose.

All maps prepared in accordance with subsection A shall be filed with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and with the offices with plat and plan approval authority or zoning responsibilities as designated by the locality for each locality in which the dam break inundation zone resides.

Owners of impounding structures may be eligible for matching grants of up to 50 percent from the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund and other sources of funding available to the Director to assist in the development of dam break inundation zone maps and for conducting incremental damage assessments in accordance with the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations.

All properties identified within the dam break inundation zone shall be incorporated by the owner into the dam safety emergency action plan of that impounding structure so as to ensure the proper notification of persons downstream and other affected persons or property owners in the event of an emergency condition at the impounding structure.

History.

2008, c. 491.

Cross references.

As to the Dam Safety, Flood Prevention and Protection Assistance Fund, generally, see Article 1.2 (§

10.1-603.17

et seq.) of this chapter.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 5 provides: “That provisions of this act shall not affect those site plans or subdivision plans that are submitted prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any dams or refuse piles approved pursuant to § 45.1-222 or 45.1-225.1.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-606.3.
Requirement for development in dam break inundation zones.

For any development proposed within the boundaries of a dam break inundation zone that has been mapped in accordance with §

10.1-606.2

, the locality shall, as part of a preliminary plan review pursuant to §

15.2-2260

, or as part of a plan review pursuant to §

15.2-2259

if no preliminary review has been conducted, (i) review the dam break inundation zone map on file with the locality for the affected impounding structure, (ii) notify the dam owner, and (iii) within 10 days forward a request to the Department of Conservation and Recreation to make a determination of the potential impacts of the proposed development on the spillway design flood standards required of the dam. The Department shall notify the dam owner and the locality of its determination within 45 days of the receipt of the request. Upon receipt of the Department’s determination, the locality shall complete the review in accordance with §

15.2-2259

or

15.2-2260

. If a locality has not received a determination within 45 days of the Department’s receipt of the request, the Department shall be deemed to have no comments, and the locality shall complete its review. Such inaction by the Department shall not affect the Board’s authority to regulate the impounding structure in accordance with this article.If the Department determines that the plan of development would change the spillway design flood standards of the impounding structure, the locality shall not permit development as defined in §

15.2-2201

or redevelopment in the dam break inundation zone unless the developer or subdivider agrees to alter the plan of development so that it does not alter the spillway design flood standard required of the impounding structure or he contributes payment to the necessary upgrades to the affected impounding structure pursuant to §

15.2-2243.1

.The developer or subdivider shall provide the dam owner and all affected localities with information necessary for the dam owner to update the dam break inundation zone map to reflect any new development within the dam break inundation zone following completion of the development.The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to any development proposed downstream of a dam for which a dam break inundation zone map is not on file with the locality as of the time of the official submission of a development plan to the locality.

The locality is authorized to map the dam break inundation zone in accordance with criteria set out in the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations (4VAC50-20) and recover the costs of such mapping from the owner of an impounding structure for which a dam break inundation zone map is not on file with the locality and a map has not been prepared by the impounding structure owner.

This section shall not be construed to supersede or conflict with the authority granted to the Department of Energy for the regulation of mineral extraction activities in the Commonwealth as set out in Title 45.2. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to permit the impairment of a vested right in accordance with §

15.2-2307

.

History.

2008, c. 491; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending or adding §§

10.1-603.17

,

10.1-603.19:1

,

10.1-606.3

, and

15.2-2243.1

shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 5 provides: “That provisions of this act shall not affect those site plans or subdivision plans that are submitted prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any dams or refuse piles approved pursuant to § 45.1-222 or 45.1-225.1.”

Effective October 1, 2021, “Title 45.2” was substituted for “Title 45.1” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy” in subsection C.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters.

§ 10.1-606.4.
Notice to the public.

When applying to the Department for a permit under the Virginia Impounding Structure Regulations (4 VAC 50-20) to construct a new high or significant hazard potential impounding structure, the applicant shall provide localities that lie within the inundation zone with copies of the construction permit request and the dam break inundation zone map.

When submitting the application to the Department, the permit applicant shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the affected localities summarizing the permit request and providing the address of locations where copies of the construction permit request and the dam break inundation zone map may be examined. The applicant shall provide copies of the published notice to the Department and to the local government offices with plat and plan approval authority or zoning responsibilities as designated by the locality.

The Department may hold, on behalf of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, a public hearing on safety issues associated with the construction permit application for the impounding structure.

The Department may require a permit applicant to provide other forms of reasonable notice, such as the placement of a sign on the proposed site, to ensure that affected parties have been informed.

The permit applicant shall send, by certified mail, to each property owner within the dam break inundation zone, a summary of the permit request and the addresses of locations where the map of the dam break inundation zone may be viewed. In the case of a condominium or cooperative, such information shall be sent to each property owner or the owners’ association. The permit applicant may rely upon real estate assessment records to identify property owners. If requested by the Department, the applicant shall provide a list of the persons to whom notice has been sent.

History.

2008, c. 491; 2011, c. 637.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 5 provides: “That provisions of this act shall not affect those site plans or subdivision plans that are submitted prior to the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 491, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any dams or refuse piles approved pursuant to § 45.1-222 or 45.1-225.1.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 637 inserted “high or significant hazard potential” in subsection A.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1101. Petition to Impound Surface Waters; No. 6-1102. Order of Publication.

§ 10.1-607.
Safety inspections.

No one shall maintain a dam which unreasonably threatens the life or property of another. The Board shall cause safety inspections to be made of impounding structures on such schedule as it deems appropriate. The time of the initial inspection and the frequency of reinspection shall depend on such factors as the condition of the structure and its size, type, location and downstream hazard potential. The owners of dams found to have deficiencies which could threaten life or property if not corrected shall take the corrective actions needed to remove such deficiencies within a reasonable time. All safety inspections shall be conducted by or under the supervision of a licensed professional engineer. Each report shall bear the seal and signature of the licensed professional engineer responsible for the inspection.

The Board shall be responsible for the inspection and reinspection of flood control dams where the maintenance and operation of the dam is the responsibility of a soil and water conservation district and where the permit for operation of the impounding structure is held by such a district.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.4; 1986, c. 209; 1988, c. 891; 2000, c. 14.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 14, in the first paragraph, deleted “not to exceed that of a phase I inspection report as established by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers” following “shall cause safety inspections” in the second sentence; and deleted “which may include a phase II inspection report as established by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers” following “take the corrective actions”
in the fourth sentence.

§ 10.1-607.1.
Criteria for designating a dam as unsafe.

Designation of a dam as unsafe shall be based on one or more of the following findings:

The dam has serious deficiencies in its design or construction or has a physical condition that if left unaddressed could result in a failure that may result in loss of life or significant damage to downstream property.

The design, construction, operation, or maintenance of the dam is such that its expected performance during flooding conditions threatens the structural integrity of the dam.

After completion of the safety inspections pursuant to §

10.1-607

, or as otherwise informed of an unsafe condition, the Department shall take actions in accordance with §

10.1-608

or

10.1-609

depending on the degree of hazard and imminence of failure caused by the unsafe condition.

History.

2006, c. 30; 2010, c. 270.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 270 inserted “significant” near the end of subdivision A 1.

§ 10.1-608.
Unsafe dams presenting imminent danger.

When the Director finds an unsafe dam constituting an imminent danger to life or property, he shall immediately notify the Department of Emergency Management and confer with the owner. The owner of a dam found to constitute an imminent danger to life or property shall take immediate corrective action. If the owner does not take appropriate and timely action to correct the danger found, the Governor shall have the authority to take immediate appropriate action, without the necessity for a hearing, to remove the imminent danger. The Attorney General may bring an action against the owner of the impounding structure for the Commonwealth’s expenses in removing the imminent danger. There shall be a lien upon the owner’s real estate for the Commonwealth’s expenses in removing the imminent danger. The owner may avoid the Commonwealth’s costs, and recover any damages, upon proving that the dam was known to be safe at the time such action was taken, and that the owner had provided or offered to immediately provide such proof to the Director before the action complained of was taken. Nothing herein shall in any way limit any authority existing under the Emergency Services and Disaster Law (§ 44-146.13 et seq.).

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.5; 1986, c. 9; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-609.
Unsafe dams presenting nonimminent danger.

Within a reasonable time after completion of a safety inspection of an impounding structure authorized by §

10.1-607

, the Board shall issue a report to the owner of the impounding structure containing its findings and recommendations for correction of any deficiencies which could threaten life or property if not corrected. Owners who have been issued a report containing recommendations for correction of deficiencies shall undertake to implement the recommendations contained in the report according to the schedule of implementation contained in the report. If an owner fails or refuses to commence or diligently implement the recommendations for correction of deficiencies according to the schedule contained in an issued report, the Director shall have the authority to issue an administrative order directing the owner to commence implementation and completion of such recommendations according to the schedule contained in the report with modifications as appropriate. Within thirty days after being served by personal service or by mail with a copy of an order issued pursuant to this section, any owner shall have the right to petition the Board for a hearing. As part of his petition, a dam owner may submit to the Board his own plan, consistent with regulations adopted pursuant to §

10.1-605

, to address the recommendations for correction of deficiencies and the schedule of implementation contained in the report. The Board shall determine if the submitted plan and schedule are sufficient to address deficiencies. A timely filed petition shall stay the effect of the administrative order.The hearing shall be conducted before the Board or a designated member thereof pursuant to § 2.2-4019. The Board shall have the authority to affirm, modify, amend or cancel the administrative order. Any owner aggrieved by a decision of the Board after a hearing shall have the right to judicial review of the final Board decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

The provisions of subsection A of this section notwithstanding, if the Director determines, after the report is issued, that changed circumstances justify reclassifying the deficiencies of an impounding structure as an imminent danger to life or property, the Director may proceed directly under §

10.1-613

for enforcement of his order, and the owner shall have the opportunity to contest the fact based upon which the administrative order was issued.

The Director, upon a determination that there is an unsafe condition at an impounding structure, is authorized to cause the lowering or complete draining of such impoundment until the unsafe condition has been corrected at the owner’s expense and prior to any authorization to refill.An owner who fails to comply with the provisions contained in an administrative order of the Department shall be subject to procedures set out in §

10.1-613

and the penalties authorized under §§

10.1-613.1

and

10.1-613.2

.

No persons, other than those authorized to maintain an impounding structure, shall interfere with the operation of an impounding structure.

History.

1982, c. 583, § 62.1-115.6; 1986, cc. 9, 615; 1988, c. 891; 1999, c. 110; 2006, c. 30; 2010, c. 270.

The 1999 amendment

added subsections C and D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 30, in subsection C, added “at the owner’s expense and prior to any authorization to refill” in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 270 inserted the fifth and sixth sentences in the first paragraph of subsection A.